es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Manualidades > Materiales para manualidades > Materiales para las artes olfativas > Materiales para hacer velas: Tintes y colorantes para velas; Aditivos de fragancia para velas; Aditivos para hacer velas; Cera virgen para velas; Portamechas; Mechas
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Arts & Crafts > Art & Crafting Materials > Olfactory Arts Materials > Candle Making Materials: Candle Dyes & Colorants; Candle Fragrance Additives; Candle Making Additives; Raw Candle Wax; Wick Tabs; Wicks
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες > Υλικά τέχνης & χειροτεχνίας > Υλικά οσφρητικής τέχνης > Υλικά κηροπλαστικής: Βαφές και χρωστικές κεριών; Αρωματικά πρόσθετα κεριών; Πρόσθετα κηροπλαστικής; Ακατέργαστο κερί για κεριά; Βάσεις φυτιλιών; Φυτίλια
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Výtvarná dielňa > Materiály pre výtvarnú dielňu > Materiály pre čuchové umenie > Materiály na výrobu sviečok: Farbivá na sviečky; Prísady vôní do sviečok; Prísady na výrobu sviečok; Surový vosk na sviečky; Knôty na výrobu sviečok; Knôty
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Umjetnost i rukotvorine > Materijali za umjetnost i rukotvorine > Materijali za olfaktornu umjetnost > Materijali za izradu svijeća: Boje i bojila za svijeće; Aditivi za mirise svijeća; Aditivi za izradu svijeća; Sirovi vosak za svijeće; Držači fitilja; Fitilji
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Művészet és barkácsolás > Művészeti és kézműves anyagok > Illatművészeti anyagok > Gyertyakészítési anyagok: Gyertyafestékek és -színezők; Gyertyaillatosítók; Gyertyakészítési adalékanyagok; Nyers gyertyaviasz; Kanóctartók; Kanócok
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 미술/공예 > 미술/공예 재료 > 후각 예술 재료 > 양초 제조 재료: 양초 염료 및 착색제; 양초 향료 첨가제; 양초 제작용 첨가제; 미가공 양초 왁스; 심지받침; 심지
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Artizanat > Materiale pentru artă/artizanat > Materiale pentru arte olfactive > Materiale pentru crearea de lumânări: Coloranți pentru lumânări; Aditivi de parfum pentru lumânări; Aditivi pentru fabricarea lumânărilor; Ceară brută pentru lumânări; Baze pentru fitiluri; Fitiluri
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > クラフト・アート > アート・クラフト用素材 > 嗅覚アート材料 > キャンドル製作材料: キャンドル用染料・着色料; キャンドル用香料; キャンドル作り用添加剤; キャンドル用ワックス; キャンドル芯用座金; キャンドル芯糸
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Řemesla a koníčky > Materiál pro umění a řemesla > Materiály pro čichové umění > Materiály na výrobu svíček: Barviva do svíček; Vonné přísady do svíček; Přísady na výrobu svíček; Vosk na výrobu svíček; Plíšky do svíček; Knoty
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Arte e artesanato > Materiais de arte e de artesanato > Materiais para artes olfativas > Materiais para fazer velas: Corantes para velas; Aditivos de fragrância para velas; Aditivos para fabricação de velas; Ceras naturais para vela; Discos de metal para confecção de velas; Pavios
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Loisirs créatifs > Matériaux pour loisirs créatifs > Matériaux pour les arts olfactifs > Matériaux pour la fabrication de bougies: Teintures et colorants pour bougies; Additifs parfumés pour bougies; Additifs pour la fabrication de bougies; Cire brute; Socles pour mèches; Mèches
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artes e trabalhos manuais > Materiais para artes e trabalhos manuais > Materiais de artes olfativas > Materiais para fazer velas: Corantes e pigmentos para velas; Aditivos de fragrância para velas; Aditivos para fabrico de velas; Cera para velas; Separadores de pavio; Pavios
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Искусство и рукоделие > Материалы для художественных работ и рукоделия > Материалы для ольфакторного искусства > Материалы для изготовления свечей: Красители для свечей; Ароматизаторы для свечей; Добавки для изготовления свечей; Воск для свечей; Держатели для фитилей; Фитили
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Изкуства и творчество > Творчески материали > Материали за създаване на аромати > Материали за правене на свещи: Бои и оцветители за свещи; Добавки за аромат на свещи; Добавки за производство на свещи; Суров восък за свещи; Основи за фитили; Фитили
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Umetnost in ročna dela > Materiali za umetniško ustvarjanje in ročna dela > Materiali za olfaktorno umetnost > Materiali za svečarstvo: Barvila za sveče; Dišavni dodatki za sveče; Dodatki za izdelavo sveč; Surovi vosek za sveče; Držala za stenje; Stenji
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Kunst og håndverk > Kunst- og håndverksmaterialer > Materialer for duftkunst > Materialer for produksjon av stearinlys: Fargestoffer for lys; Dufttilsetninger for lys; Tilsetningsstoffer for lysstøping; Rå lysvoks; Vekehylser; Veker
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Artigianato e hobby > Materiali per hobby e artigianato > Materiali per le arti olfattive > Materiali per la creazione di candele: Coloranti per candele; Additivi profumati per candele; Additivi per la creazione di candele; Cera grezza per candele; Base per stoppini; Stoppini
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Hantverk och hobbyer > Hobbymaterial > Olfaktoriska hobbymaterial > Ljusstöpningsmaterial: Ljusfärger; Doftoljor för ljus; Tillsatser för ljustillverkning; Råvax; Vekeshållare; Vekar
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Sztuka i rękodzieło > Materiały dla artystów i rękodzielników > Materiały do tworzenia zapachów > Materiały do wyrobu świec: Barwniki do świec; Dodatki zapachowe do świec; Dodatki do wyrobu świec; Surowy wosk na świece; Blaszki do knotów; Knoty
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 手工艺品 > 手工艺材料 > 嗅觉艺术材料 > 蜡烛制作材料: 蜡烛染料与着色剂; 蜡烛香精添加剂; 蜡烛制作添加剂; 未加工烛用蜡; 灯芯夹/底座; 灯芯/烛芯
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Kunsthandwerk & Hobby > Kunst- & Bastelmaterialien > Materialien zur Duftherstellung > Materialien zur Kerzenherstellung: Kerzenfarben & -pigmente; Kerzendüfte; Zusätze für die Kerzenherstellung; Rohes Kerzenwachs; Dochthalter; Dochte
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Handwerk en hobby's > Handwerk- en hobbymaterialen > Materialen voor geurkunsten > Materialen voor het maken van kaarsen: Kaarskleurstoffen; Geurstoffen voor kaarsen; Additieven voor kaarsen maken; Pure kaarsenwas; Lonthouders; Lonten
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Taide ja askartelu > Askartelumateriaalit > Hajuaistia hyödyntävän taiteen materiaalit > Kynttilän valmistusmateriaalit: Kynttilävärit; Kynttilöiden tuoksuaineet; Kynttilänvalmistuksen lisäaineet; Steariini; Sydänlangan kiekot; Sydänlangat
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 藝術品和手工藝品 > 藝術/手作材料 > 嗅覺藝術材料 > 蠟燭製作材料: 蠟燭染料與著色劑; 蠟燭香氛添加物; 蠟燭製作添加物; 燭用蠟; 燈芯固定片; 燈芯
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Sanatlar ve El İşleri > Sanat ve El İşleri Malzemeleri > Koku Sanatı Malzemeleri > Mum Yapım Malzemeleri: Mum boyaları ve renklendiricileri; Mum koku katkı maddeleri; Mum yapımı katkı maddeleri; Ham Mum Parafini; Fitil Klipsleri; Fitiller
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Menai ir amatai > Menų ir amatų medžiagos > Uoslės lavinimo medžiagos > Žvakių gamybos medžiagos: Žvakių dažai ir spalvikliai; Žvakių kvapų priedai; Žvakių gamybos priedai; Neapdorotas žvakių vaškas; Dagčio laikikliai; Dagčiai
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > วัสดุงานศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > วัสดุศิลปะการดมกลิ่น > วัสดุอุปกรณ์ทำเทียน: สีผสมเทียน; น้ำหอมทำเทียน; สารเติมแต่งทำเทียน; แวกซ์เทียนดิบ; ฐานใส่ไส้ตะเกียง; ไส้ตะเกียง
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Håndarbejde og hobby > Materialer til håndarbejde og hobby > Materialer til olfaktorisk kunst > Materialer til fremstilling af stearinlys: Farvestoffer til stearinlys; Dufttilsætning til lys; Tilsætningsstoffer til lystøbning; Uforarbejdet voks til fremstilling af lys; Vægeholdere til stearinlys; Væger
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Vật liệu nghệ thuật & thủ công mỹ nghệ > Vật liệu chế tác hương thơm > Vật liệu làm nến: Thuốc nhuộm và chất tạo màu nến; Phụ gia tạo hương nến; Phụ gia làm nến; Sáp nến thô; Đế bấc; Bấc đèn